New Jersey, session 221, S3234.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Department of Human Services shall establish a direct support professional funding program to distribute monies to employers of direct support professionals in an amount that is necessary to address direct support professional staffing challenges in this State, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services.  The monies shall be used by the employers to increase the pay of existing or new employees who are direct support professionals.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall establish an application process, guidelines, and compliance standards for the direct support professional funding program. 2.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services such funds as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the distribution of funds appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act.